Hawaii statutes.
§437D-9 Posting requirements. Except
as provided in section 437D-17, each lessor who offers the damage waiver shall
conspicuously display at the rental area of each rental location a notice, in
plain language and printing, that includes all of the information in section
437D-5(a)(1), (2), (5), and (6), and a statement that restrictions or
conditions apply. [L 1988, c 251, pt of §2; am L 2009, c 148, §9]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next